Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.700

Identification and criminal history section.

There is hereby established within the Washington state patrol a section on identification and criminal history hereafter referred to as the section.

In order to aid the administration of justice the section shall install systems for the identification of individuals, including the fingerprint system and such other systems as the chief deems necessary. The section shall keep a complete record and index of all information received in convenient form for consultation and comparison.

The section shall obtain from whatever source available and file for record the fingerprints, palmprints, photographs, or such other identification data as it deems necessary, of persons who have been or shall hereafter be lawfully arrested and charged with, or convicted of any criminal offense. The section may obtain like information concerning persons arrested for or convicted of crimes under the laws of another state or government.

[ 2006 c 294 s 1; 1998 c 141 s 2; 1989 c 334 s 6; 1987 c 486 s 9; 1985 c 201 s 7; 1984 c 17 s 17; 1972 ex.s. c 152 s 1.]